Illinois, session 104th, HB1042.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended by 5adding Section 8-6 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 150/8-6 new)7    Sec. 8-6. Electronic monitoring of sexual predators and 8certain other offenders.9    (a) In this Section, "approved electronic monitoring 10device" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 5-8A-2 of the 11Unified Code of Corrections. 12    (b) A person shall be required to wear an approved 13electronic monitoring device for the first 5 years of the 14person's period of registration if the person is:15        (1) a sex offender convicted of an offense that would 16    qualify the person as a sexual predator; or17        (2) required to register as a sex offender and:18            (A) was convicted of criminal sexual assault, 19        aggravated criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal 20        sexual assault of a child, criminal sexual abuse, 21        aggravated criminal sexual abuse, or ritualized abuse 22        of a child, when the victim was under 18 years of age 23        at the time of the commission of the offense; and  HB1042- 2 -LRB104 03256 RLC 13278 b1            (B) used force or the threat of force in the 2        commission of the offense.3    (c) If the person fails to register or violates laws that 4regulate sex offenders, the person shall be required to wear 5the approved electronic monitoring device for an additional 3 6years.7    (d) The Illinois State Police and the law enforcement 8agency having jurisdiction shall monitor the person required 9to wear an approved electronic monitoring device to ensure 10compliance with this Section.